West Virginia, session 2026, HB5439.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3C.  POLLINATOR PROTECTION ACT. §20-3C-1. Pollinator protection act; creation of pollinator program. (a) Pollinator Protection Program. The Department of Agriculture (DOA) shall develop a pollinator protection program.  The purpose of the program is to promote the health of and mitigate the risks to all pollinator species in West Virginia and ensure a robust agricultural economy and apiary industry for honeybees and other managed pollinators.(1) In developing the program, the DOA shall seek the assistance of the Division of Forestry and Division of Natural Resources and shall establish a stakeholder group composed of representatives of affected groups, including beekeepers, agricultural producers, agribusiness and farmer organizations, and conservation interests.(2) The program shall include a plan for the protection of pollinators that:(A) Mitigates damage from invasive species of plants;(B) Encourages the planting of low maintenance pollinator-friendly habitats on private property;(C) Creates a strategy for the planting of low maintenance pollinator-friendly habitats in state parks and state forests;(D) Helps identify additional opportunities for education and outreach on pollinators; and(E) Utilizes state or federal grant programs and non-profit resources to protect pollinators.